Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 17 Retirement of Teachers in State Schools

16-17-1.
State retirement system extended to teachers in state schools.

Teachers in state universities, colleges, or schools shall be covered under the provisions of chapters 8, 9, and 10 of title 36 and chapters 16 and 17.1 of this title.

History of Section.

P.L. 1948, ch. 2102, § 1; impl. am. P.L. 1951, ch. 2686, § 3; G.L. 1956, §

16-17-1

; impl. am. P.L. 1959, ch. 44, § 2; P.L. 1981, ch. 126, § 1.

16-17-2 — 16-17-15.
Repealed.